Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.240

Exemption of Washington state commodity commissions.

Unless otherwise directed in the commodity commission enabling statute, this chapter shall not apply to the Washington state commodity commissions created either under separate statute or under the provisions of chapters 15.65 and 15.66 RCW: PROVIDED, That all such commissions shall submit estimates and such other necessary information as may be required for the development of the budget and shall also be subject to audit by the appropriate state auditing agency or officer.

[ 1995 c 374 s 60; 1981 c 225 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.88.240. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.